Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-1413
Training center; tuition, fees, and
expenses; how paid.

Tuition, fees, and such other expenses
incurred in the pre-certification and certification training of applicants
shall be the responsibility of the person or his or her employing agency. Such expenses also may be financed by the
training center through other appropriated funds as determined by the council.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 13, p. 2930;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 1162, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 746, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB844, § 1.